Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202583-174.04
Violation of condition of community supervision; actions authorized.

An individual who violates one or more of the conditions of community supervision established for him or her pursuant to section 83-174.03 shall undergo a review by the department to evaluate the risk posed to the public by the violation in question. The department may take any of the following actions in response to a violation of conditions of community supervision:

(1) Revise or impose additional conditions of community supervision in order to minimize the risk to the public from the continued presence of the individual in the community;

(2) Forward to the Attorney General or the county attorney in the county where the individual resides a request to initiate a criminal prosecution for failure to comply with the terms of community supervision; or

(3) Forward to the county attorney or Attorney General a recommendation that civil commitment proceedings be instituted with respect to the individual.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 90;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 137.